Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 7. Diversion Center Incarceration Program.

§ 53.1-67.7.
Repealed by Acts 2019, c. 618, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to establishment of community corrections alternative program and supervision upon completion, see §

53.1-67.9

.

Editor’s note.

Former Article 7 (§

53.1-67.7

), relating to establishment of Diversion Center Incarceration Program, derived from 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 2000, c. 338.